Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR
PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES

25.5-6-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Home- and Community-based Services for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-621 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-402. Legislative declaration - Prader-Willi syndrome.

The general assembly finds and declares that it is the purpose of this part 4 to provide services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities that would foster the following goals:

To maintain eligible persons in the most appropriate settings possible and to minimize admissions to institutions;

To recognize the unique services requirements of persons with developmental disabilities;

To provide optimum accessibility to various important social, habilitative, remedial, residential, and health services that are available to assist in maintaining eligible persons in the least restrictive settings;

To provide eligible persons who have the capacity to remain outside an institutional setting access to appropriate social, habilitative, remedial, residential, and health services, without which institutionalization would be necessary;

To provide the most efficient and effective use of funds in the delivery of these social, habilitative, remedial, residential, and health services to eligible persons;

To coordinate, integrate, and link these social, habilitative, remedial, residential, and health services into existing community-based service delivery systems for persons with developmental disabilities, to avoid unnecessary and expensive duplication of services;

To allow the state substantial flexibility in organizing and administering the delivery of social, habilitative, remedial, residential, and health services to eligible citizens.

The general assembly intends that the state department and the department of human services shall cooperate to the maximum extent possible in designing, implementing, and administering the programs authorized under this part 4.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to disqualify persons from receiving any benefits to which they would otherwise be eligible under parts 1 and 2 of article 5 of this title, or under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, by reason of being designated as a person with developmental disabilities.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

Prader-Willi syndrome is a genetic condition that occurs in approximately one in fifteen to twenty-five thousand people worldwide, and there are up to three hundred seventy-five individuals living with this syndrome in Colorado;

Because Prader-Willi syndrome is a genetic disorder, individuals either have it or they do not. Further, because there is not currently a cure, individuals who have Prader-Willi syndrome will have it for life.

This disorder affects members of every culture, religion, economic class, race, and social order;

The most critical hallmark of Prader-Willi syndrome is overeating. Individuals with Prader-Willi syndrome cannot tell when they are full and will continue to eat without stop, leading to ruptured stomachs and even death. Other symptoms include significant developmental and cognitive delays, skin picking, sleep problems, obsessive-compulsive behaviors, hypothyroidism, hypogonadism, and low muscle tone.

The state of Colorado does not currently recognize Prader-Willi syndrome as an intellectual and developmental disability.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1942, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 18-074), ch. 98, p. 769, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-622 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-403. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Developmentally disabled person" means a person with an intellectual and developmental disability as defined in subsection (3.3)(a) of this section.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case management agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (2).

"Eligible person" means a person with developmental disabilities:

Who meets the definition of categorically needy as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (4);

Who is in need of the level of care available in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities;

Whose gross income does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefits level or other applicable standard provided in federal regulations construing the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and whose resources do not exceed the limit established for individuals receiving a mandatory minimum state supplementation of supplemental security income benefits or, in the case of a person who is married, do not exceed the amount authorized in section 25.5-6-101; and

For whom it is determined that provision of such services is necessary to avoid placement in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

The amount of parental income and resources that shall be attributable to a child's gross income for purposes of eligibility under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be set forth in rules promulgated by the state board of human services created in section 26-1-107, C.R.S.

(2.5)

[

Editor's note: This subsection (2.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Entity" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (8).

"In-home services" means those services described in section 25.5-10-205 provided to support persons living with their family.

(3.3) (a) "Intellectual and developmental disability" means a disability that manifests before the person reaches twenty-two years of age, that constitutes a substantial disability to the affected person, and that is attributable to an intellectual and developmental disability or related conditions, including Prader-Willi syndrome, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or other neurological conditions when those conditions result in impairment of general intellectual functioning or adaptive behavior similar to that of a person with an intellectual and developmental disability. Unless otherwise specifically stated, the federal definition of "developmental disability" found in 42 U.S.C. sec. 15002 (8) does not apply.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.3)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Person with an intellectual and developmental disability" or "youth with an intellectual and developmental disability" means a person or youth determined by a community-centered board to have an intellectual and developmental disability and shall include a child with a developmental delay.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.3)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Person with an intellectual and developmental disability" or "youth with an intellectual and developmental disability" means a person or youth determined by a case management agency to have an intellectual and developmental disability and includes a child with a developmental delay.

"Child with a developmental delay" means:

A person less than five years of age with delayed development as defined by rule of the state board; or

A person less than five years of age who is at risk of having an intellectual and developmental disability as defined by rule of the state board.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Plan of care" means a coordinated plan of care for provision of services in other than a nursing facility or institutional setting, developed and managed, subject to review and approval pursuant to section 25.5-6-404, by a community centered board for persons with developmental disabilities. This plan of care shall fully identify the services to be provided to eligible persons. Prior to the provision of those services, a physician may be required to review an assessment document to insure that it adequately describes the medical needs of the eligible person.

(4)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Plan of care" means a coordinated plan of care for provision of services in other than a nursing facility or institutional setting, developed and managed, subject to review and approval pursuant to section 25.5-6-404, by a case management agency for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities. This plan of care shall fully identify the services to be provided to eligible persons. Prior to the provision of those services, a physician may be required to review an assessment document to insure that it adequately describes the medical needs of the eligible person.

"Services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities" means those services:

(I) Approved for reimbursement by the federal government; and

(II) Necessary to prevent a person, eligible for services under subsection (2) of this section, from being subjected to placement in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

"Services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities" includes, but is not limited to, social, habilitative, remedial, residential, health services, and services provided under the consumer-directed care service model, part 11 of this article, which shall include the selection, from a list of qualified entities, of an organization of the eligible person's choice to provide financial management services for the eligible person.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1943, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(IV), and (5)(a)(II) amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2294, § 5, effective June 5; (1), (3), IP(5)(a), (5)(a)(II), and (5)(b) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1810, § 47, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(3.3) added, (HB 14-1368), ch. 304, p. 1288, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

(1), (3.3)(a), and (3.3)(c)(II) amended, (SB 18-074), ch. 98, p. 770, § 2, effective August 8; (3.3)(a) amended, (SB 18-096), ch. 44, p. 474, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(3.3)(a) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3473, § 40, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1), (3.3)(b), and (4) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 334, § 31, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-6-404. Duties of the department of health care policy and financing and the department of human services.

The state department and the department of human services shall provide a system of reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this part 4 that encourages the most cost-effective provision of services.

The state department and the department of human services shall, subject to appropriation, utilize any available federal, state, local, or private funds, including but not limited to, medicaid funds available under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, such as medicaid home- and community-based waivers, to carry out the purposes of this part 4.

The state department may contract with the department of human services to certify agencies providing services under this part 4 as eligible medicaid providers, to adopt fiscal and administrative procedures, to review plans of care, to set rates, and to make and implement recommendations regarding the scope, duration, and content of programs and the eligibility of persons for specific services provided pursuant to this part 4, and to fulfill any other responsibilities necessary to implement this part 4 that are consistent with the single state agency designation set out in section 25.5-4-104.

The executive director and the state board shall promulgate such rules regarding this part 4 as are necessary to fulfill the obligations of the state department as the single state agency to administer medical assistance programs in accordance with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended. Such rules may include, but shall not be limited to, determination of the level of care requirements for long-term care, patient payment requirements, clients' rights, medicaid eligibility, and appeal rights associated with these requirements.

The state board of human services, created in section 26-1-107, C.R.S., shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement the provisions of this part 4 and to fulfill the responsibilities and duties set out in article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S. Such rules shall be promulgated pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

In the event that a direct conflict arises between the rules of the state department promulgated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and the rules of the department of human services promulgated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, regarding implementation of this part 4, the rules of the state department shall control.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1944, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-624 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-405. Relationship to other programs.

The provisions of part 3 of this article are separate and distinct from the provisions of this part 4. Therefore, the definitions and restrictions embodied in part 3 of this article shall not apply to services and programs provided pursuant to this part 4.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1945, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-625 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-406. Appropriations - reimbursement for services - direct support professionals - legislative declaration - definitions.

To carry out duties and obligations pursuant to this part 4 and for the administration and provision of services to eligible persons, all medicaid funds appropriated pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, for the provision of care for persons with developmental disabilities and all other funds otherwise appropriated by the general assembly as additional sources of program funding are available for the placement of eligible persons either in intermediate care facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities or alternatives to such placements.

The general assembly finds and declares that:
(2) (a) (I) The general assembly finds and declares that:

Colorado's system of home- and community-based services that supports Coloradans with intellectual and developmental disabilities has grown to serve more than twelve thousand persons and their families;

Costs associated with providing these services continue to rise with growth in demand, inflation, increased regulation, rising minimum wages, rising health-care costs, and other economic factors;

Reimbursement rates have not kept pace with these rising costs, resulting in reduced access to services for Coloradans with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Colorado needs significant initial investments to address the most urgent issues concerning services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as well as future long-term planning to address the growing strain on the system;

One of the most urgent issues is the workforce crisis among direct support professionals, characterized by chronically low wages, limited benefits, and lack of career advancement opportunities for these critical workers;

Colorado is experiencing a workforce crisis among direct support professionals because reimbursement rates cannot support the compensation needed to match the high level of responsibility required in these jobs;

Agencies that serve people with intellectual and developmental disabilities increasingly struggle to recruit and retain direct support professionals to meet the demand for services; and

High turnover among direct support professionals results in reduced continuity of services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Therefore, as an initial investment, Colorado's reimbursement rates should be increased to allow for direct support professional compensation that better reflects market realities and the high level of responsibility required in these jobs.

As used in this subsection (2), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Compensation" means any form of monetary payment, including bonuses, employer-paid health and other insurance programs, paid time off, payroll taxes, and all other fixed and variable benefits conferred on or received by a direct support professional.

"Direct support professional" means a worker who assists or supervises a worker to assist a person with intellectual and developmental disabilities to lead a fulfilling life in the community through a diverse range of services, including helping the person get ready in the morning, take medication, go to work or find work, and participate in social activities. "Direct support professional" includes all workers categorized as program direct support professionals and excludes workers categorized as administrative, as defined in standards established by the Financial Accounting Standards Board.

The state department shall immediately seek a six and one-half percent increase in the reimbursement rate for the following services delivered through the home- and community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities, supported living services, and children's extensive supports waivers:

Group residential services and supports;

Individual residential services and supports;

Specialized habilitation;

Respite;

Homemaker basic;

Homemaker enhanced;

Personal care;

Prevocational services;

Behavioral line staff;

Community connector;

Supported community connections;

Mentorship;

Supported employment - job development; and

Supported employment - job coaching.

The state department shall implement a corresponding increase in service plan authorization limits to account for this increase in reimbursement rates.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(e) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Service agencies shall use one hundred percent of the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section to increase compensation for direct support professionals above the rate of compensation that direct support professionals are receiving as of June 30, 2018. This requirement applies to funds billed by community-centered boards in their role as organized health-care delivery systems. Service agencies shall not use funding resulting from the reimbursement rate increase for general and administrative expenses, such as chief executive officer salaries, human resources, information technology, oversight, business management, general record keeping, budgeting and finance, and other activities not identifiable to a single program.

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(e) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Service agencies shall use one hundred percent of the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section to increase compensation for direct support professionals above the rate of compensation that direct support professionals are receiving as of June 30, 2018. This requirement applies to funds billed by case management agencies and entities in their role as organized health-care delivery systems, as defined in 42 CFR 447.10 (b). Service agencies shall not use funding resulting from the reimbursement rate increase for general and administrative expenses, such as chief executive officer salaries, human resources, information technology, oversight, business management, general record keeping, budgeting and finance, and other activities not identifiable to a single program.

For the 2018-19 through 2020-21 fiscal years, service agencies shall track how they used the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section using a reporting tool developed by the state department in collaboration with service agencies. On or before December 31, 2019, service agencies shall submit the report to the state department demonstrating how the funding was used to increase direct support professional compensation for the 2018-19 fiscal year. The state department shall have ongoing discretion to request information from service agencies demonstrating how they maintained increases in compensation for direct support professionals beyond the three-year tracking period.

Service agencies shall maintain all books, documents, papers, accounting records, and other evidence required to support the tracking of payroll information for increased compensation to direct support professionals pursuant to subsection (2)(f)(I) of this section for at least three years from the end of each respective fiscal year. Service agencies shall make the information and materials available for inspection by the state department or its designees at all reasonable times.

If a service agency does not use one hundred percent of the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section to increase compensation for direct support professionals, the state department may recoup part or all of the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate.

If the state department determines that the service agency did not use the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section as required, within one year after the end of each fiscal year described in subsection (2)(f)(I) of this section, the state department shall notify the service agency in writing of the state department's intention to recoup funds pursuant to subsection (2)(g) of this section.

The service agency has forty-five days after receiving notice of the determination under subsection (2)(h) of this section to:

Challenge the determination of the state department;

Provide additional information to the state department demonstrating compliance; or

Submit a plan of correction to the state department.

The state department shall notify the service agency in writing of its final determination after affording the service agency the opportunity to take the actions specified in subsection (2)(i) of this section.

The state department shall recoup from a service agency one hundred percent of the funding resulting from the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section that the service agency received but did not use for compensation for direct support professionals if:

The service agency fails to respond to a notice of determination of the state department within the time provided in subsection (2)(i) of this section;

The service agency is unable to provide documentation of compliance; or

The state department does not accept the plan of correction submitted by the service agency pursuant to subsection (2)(i) of this section.

The state department shall participate in the national core indicators staff stability survey.

Once the state department determines that a sufficient quantity and quality of data exists to determine the impact and outcomes, if any, attributed to the increase in the reimbursement rate pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section on persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, the state department shall include in its annual report concerning the waiting list for services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, required pursuant to section 25.5-10-207.5, information from the national core indicators data, or another comparable source, concerning in what ways outcomes for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities changed as a result of the increase in reimbursement rates pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section. The report must include, if available, multiyear personal outcome data specific to Colorado and comparisons to other states, as appropriate, as well as data from the national core indicators staff stability survey.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1945, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2294, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1407), ch. 248, p. 1527, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

(2)(f) and (2)(h) amended, (HB 20-1363), ch. 204, p. 1007, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 334, § 32, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-626 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1407, see section 1 of chapter 248, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-407. Gifts - grants.

The state department and the department of human services, acting on behalf of the state, may receive and accept title to gifts or grants from any source, including the federal government. Both departments shall deposit all grants, grants-in-aid, and gifts with the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the general fund. These moneys shall remain available for appropriation to either department to carry out the purposes of this part 4.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1946, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-627 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-408. Eligibility - fees.

Subject to the availability of federal financial participation, services shall be provided to eligible persons pursuant to this part 4.

Any eligible person who accepts and receives services pursuant to this part 4 shall pay to the state department, or to an agent designated by the state department, an amount determined pursuant to federal regulations construing the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, concerning the application of patient income to the cost of services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1946, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-628 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-409. Services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

A program to provide home- and community-based services to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are in need of the level of care available in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities is hereby established pursuant to the federal "Social Security Act", as amended. This program shall provide for the social, habilitative, remedial, residential, health, and other needs of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities to avoid placement in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Services for persons with developmental disabilities provided through this program shall be delivered under the provisions of a statewide services plan, in the form of home- and community-based services waivers or model waivers, developed by the state department and the department of human services and approved by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, or any successor agency. This plan shall include the specific services to be offered, a plan for the delivery of such services through community centered boards or other service agencies approved pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S., utilizing where appropriate the provision of in-home services, the expected costs of such services, the expected benefits of providing those services, and the administrative provisions which shall govern the implementation of the plan. The plan shall provide for all necessary safeguards to ensure the health and welfare of any eligible persons. The average per capita expenditure for services under this plan shall not exceed the average per capita expenditure the department of human services or the state department would have made for services otherwise available without this plan.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities provided through this program must be delivered under the provisions of a statewide services plan, in the form of home- and community-based services waivers or model waivers, developed by the state department and the department of human services and approved by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, or any successor agency. This plan must include the specific services to be offered, a plan for the delivery of such services through case management agencies or other service agencies approved pursuant to this article 6 or article 10.5 of title 27 utilizing where appropriate the provision of in-home services, the expected costs of such services, the expected benefits of providing those services, and the administrative provisions which shall govern the implementation of the plan. The plan must provide for all necessary safeguards to ensure the health and welfare of any eligible persons. The average per capita expenditure for services under this plan must not exceed the average per capita expenditure the department of human services or the state department would have made for services otherwise available without this plan.

The plan shall utilize existing community-based services programs to the maximum extent possible and shall coordinate all available forms of assistance for the eligible person.

Any services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities provided through this program shall be set forth in a plan of care developed and managed by a community-centered board and subject to review and approval pursuant to section 25.5-6-404. The plan of care shall:

Be based on the particular services needs of the eligible person;

Describe the services necessary to avoid institutionalization; and

Include a process by which the person who is receiving services may receive necessary care for medical purposes, which may include respite care, if the person's service provider is unavailable due to an emergency situation or to unforeseen circumstances. The person who is receiving services and the person's family or guardian shall be duly informed by the community centered board of these alternative care provisions at the time the plan of care is initiated.

Nothing in this paragraph (c) requires a community centered board to provide services set forth in a plan of care that the community centered board is not otherwise required to provide to the person receiving services, only that the plan of care include a contingency for such services.

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

No later than January 2024, the state department shall submit a report to the senate health and human services committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the house of representatives health and insurance committee, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must identify:

A reimbursement system with a goal to incentivize and increase transportation provider participation;

How the state department will ensure compliance with applicable federal laws and waiver requirements;

A system of common reporting to ensure a recipient does not exceed the medicaid benefit in a multi-provider scenario; and

Best practices based on what other states have done to allow transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services, including but not limited to, reimbursement rates; driver compensation; and integration with programs that provide nonmedical transportation services.

In developing the report, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, individuals with disabilities, and transportation network companies. The report may be developed in conjunction with the reporting requirement in sections 25.5-6-307 (6), 25.5-6-606 (9), 25.5-6-704 (8), and 25.5-6-1303 (9).

Upon completion of the report described in subsection (5)(a) of this section, the state department shall analyze and review each operational transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3). The state department shall verify each transportation network company's viability to ensure the health, safety, welfare, cost effectiveness, and capability in expanding nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services pursuant to this section and comply with all rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (5)(e)(I) of this section.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state department shall authorize verified transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services if the state department finds the transportation network company viable under federal requirements and within budgetary constraints.

For the purposes of this subsection (5)(c), "verify" means a transportation network company meets all requirements resulting from the report described in subsection (5)(a) of this section.

The state department may seek any necessary federal authorization for the implementation of this subsection (5).

The state department shall promulgate any necessary rules to ensure transportation network companies comply with federal and state oversight requirements and shall include all relevant stakeholders, including medicaid recipients, transportation network companies, current providers and drivers for nonmedical transportation services, and other interested parties in the development of such requirements.

Pursuant to section 40-10.1-105 (1)(l), transportation network companies are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission when providing nonmedical transportation services pursuant to this section and are instead subject to rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (5)(e).

This subsection (5) does not apply to a provider authorized to provide transportation services pursuant to part 8 of article 1 of title 25.5 prior to August 10, 2022.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1946, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2294, § 7, effective June 5; (1) and IP(4) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1811, § 48, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 335, § 33, effective July 1, 2024; (4)(d) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 335, 354, §§ 33, 70.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (HB 22-1114), ch. 396, p. 2817, § 3, effective August 10.